North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 28. Future of the North Carolina Railroad Study Commission. [Repealed]

§§ 120-245 through 120-255.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011, and Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-245; 1999-237, s. 27.25(a); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-246; 1999-237, s. 27.25(b); 2000-138, s. 8.1; 2001-486, s. 2.8; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-247; 1999-237, s. 27.25(c); 2000-138, s. 8.2; 2000-146, s. 12; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-248; 1999-237, s. 27.25(d); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-249; 1999-237, s. 27.25(e); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-250; 1999-237, s. 27.25(f); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-251; 1999-237, s. 27.25(g); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-252; 1999-237, s. 27.25(h); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-253; 1999-237, s. 27.25(i); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-254; 1999-237, s. 27.25(j); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-255; 1999-237, s. 27.25(k); 2000-138, s. 8.3; 2000-146, s. 13; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.22, effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.7(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-256,
120-257.

Reserved for future codification purposes.